Tennessee, session 114, SB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-49-104(e), is amended by deleting
subdivision (3) and substituting:
(3) Four percent (4%) of the privilege tax collected under this section must be
distributed by the council to the state treasurer and allocated to the department of mental
health and substance abuse services to use in the manner prescribed by § 4-49-119.
(4) One percent (1%) of the privilege tax collected under this section must be
distributed by the council to the state treasurer and allocated to the department of
veterans services to be used to support veterans services in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1200
002986
- 1 -